src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_22_s_Por
  +Sg      :^WGs           nom_end           ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste
  +Sg      :^WGs           nom_R             ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste

  +Pl      :đe             nom_t             ;
  +Sg      :đe             gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :%>t            par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :te^HMETA       ill_hVVn          ;
  +Sg      :te             ess_nnA           ;
  +Sg      :đe             sgpl_cases_odd    ;

  +Pl      :ksi%>i2        gen_tten          ;
  +Pl      :ksi%>i2        par_end           ;
  +Pl      :ksi%>i2        par_tA            ;
  +Pl      :ks^HMETA       ill_hiin          ;
  +Pl      :ks%>i2         ess_nnA           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2         com_nne           ;
  +Pl      :ks%>i2         sgpl_cases_odd    ; ! TODO wtf is this comm --> hmm, tämä menee pieleen, sg ≠ pl

  LEXICON x_22_s_NOT_Por
    +Sg      :^WGs           nom_end           ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste
    +Sg      :^WGs           nom_R             ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste

    +Pl      :e              nom_t             ;
    +Sg      :e              gen_n_sg          ;
    +Sg      :%>t            par_tA            ;
    +Sg      :te^HMETA       ill_hVVn          ;
    +Sg      :te             ess_nnA           ;
    +Sg      :e              sgpl_cases_odd    ;

    +Pl      :ks%>i2         gen_tten          ; ! maybe add ksi and remove i2
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         par_A             ;
    +Pl      :ks^HMETA       ill_hiin          ;
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         ess_nnA           ;
    +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2         com_nne           ;
    +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2         com_ne            ;
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         sgpl_cases_odd    ; ! TODO wtf is this comm --> hmm, tämä menee pieleen, sg ≠ pl


! LEXICON vanha_n_32s != @CODE@  sairhaus vanha versio
!        +N:t              long_par          ;
!        +N:te             obl_strong        ;
!        +N:te^WG          weak_v_stem       ;
!     +N+Sg:^WG            sgpl_cases_odd    ;
!     +N+Pl:^WG%>i2        sgpl_cases_odd    ;
!     +N+Pl:ks%>i2         par_V             ;
!     +N+Pl:ks%>i2         gen_Vn            ;
!     +N+Pl:ks%>i2         horterillpl      ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_32t
                           !n_32             ; ! ei tehty

!LEXICON vanha_n_33 ! ei tehty
                           !n_33s            ;

LEXICON n_22_s_even !!= @CODE@  avaruus
+N+Dial/Por:^Por    x_22_s_even_Por     ;
+N+Dial/Var:^Var    x_22_s_even_NOT_Por ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^Jok    x_22_s_even_NOT_Por ;

LEXICON x_22_s_even_Por
  +Sg      :^WGs           nom_end           ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste
  +Sg      :^WGs           nom_R             ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste

  +Pl      :đe             nom_t             ;
  +Sg      :đe             gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :%>t            par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :te^HMETA       ill_hVVn          ;
  +Sg      :te             ess_nA           ;
  +Sg      :đe             sgpl_cases_even    ;

  +Pl      :ksi%>i2        gen_tten          ;
  +Pl      :ksi%>i2        par_end           ;
  +Pl      :ksi%>i2        par_tA            ;
  +Pl      :ks^HMETA       ill_hiin          ;
  +Pl      :ks%>i2         ess_nA           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2         com_ne           ;
  +Pl      :ks%>i2         sgpl_cases_even    ; 

  LEXICON x_22_s_even_NOT_Por
    +Sg      :^WGs           nom_end           ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste
    +Sg      :^WGs           nom_R             ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste

    +Pl      :e              nom_t             ;
    +Sg      :e              gen_n_sg          ;
    +Sg      :%>t            par_tA            ;
    +Sg      :te^HMETA       ill_hVVn          ;
    +Sg      :te             ess_nA           ;
    +Sg      :e              sgpl_cases_even    ;

    +Pl      :ks%>i2         gen_tten          ;
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         par_A             ;
    +Pl      :ks^HMETA       ill_hiin          ;
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         ess_nA           ;
    +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2         com_ne           ;
    +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2         com_ne            ;
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         sgpl_cases_even    ; 

LEXICON n_32_as !!= @CODE@ rakas, asukas
+N         : x_32_as ;

LEXICON x_32_as
  +Sg+Nom:a^WG%>s      K                 ;
  +Sg      :a^WG%>s      par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :haa          ill_sseen         ;
!      +Pl+Ill:h%>aissiin   K                 ;
  +Sg      :h%>aa        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :h%>aa        ess_nA             ;
  +Sg      :h%>aa        sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl      :h%>aa        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     gen_tten          ; ! asukkhaitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>a%>je     gen_n             ; ! rakkhajen
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     par_tA            ; ! asukkhaita
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>a%>j      par_A             ; ! rakkhaja
  ! +N+Pl+Ess:h%>a%>i2%>na PxxK              ;
  +Pl      :h%>ai        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>aa%>i2    ess_nA             ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;

LEXICON n_32_as_pl !!= @CODE@ rakas, asukas
+N         : x_32_as_pl ;

LEXICON x_32_as_pl
  +Pl      :h%>aa        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     gen_tten          ; ! asukkhaitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>a%>je     gen_n             ; ! rakkhajen
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     par_tA            ; ! asukkhaita
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>a%>j      par_A             ; ! rakkhaja
  ! +N+Pl+Ess:h%>a%>i2%>na PxxK              ;
  +Pl      :h%>ai        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>aa%>i2    ess_nA             ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_33aes
!        +N:             vanha_x_33aes           ;

LEXICON n_32_aes
+N         : x_32_aes ;

LEXICON x_32_aes
  +Sg+Nom:ä^WG%>s      K                 ;
  +Sg      :ä^WG%>s      par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :hää          ill_sseen         ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        ess_nA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        sgpl_cases_even   ;
    !    +Pl+Ill:h%>äissiin   K                 ;

  +Pl      :h%>ää        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     gen_tten          ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     par_tA            ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hä%>je       gen_n             ; ! sinnikkhäjen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hä%>j        par_A             ; ! sinnikkhäjä
  +Pl      :h%>äi        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     ess_nA            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ää%>i2    ess_nA            ; ! TODO choose one
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;

LEXICON n_32_ae !!= @CODE@ kevät
+N         : x_32_ae ;

LEXICON x_32_ae
  +Sg+Nom  :ä^WG%>t      K                 ;
  +Sg+Nom  :ä^WG         K                 ;
  +Sg      :ä^WG%>t      par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :hää          ill_sseen         ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        ess_nA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl      :h%>ää        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     gen_tten          ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     par_tA            ;
  +Pl      :h%>äi        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     ess_nA            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_33ys !!= @CODE@ rakas
!        +N:        vanha_x_33ys ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%>y^WGs R      ;



LEXICON n_32_is !!= @CODE@ ruvis, ruumis
+N+Dial/Por:^Por x_32_is ;
+N+Dial/Var:^Var x_32_is ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^Jok x_32_is ;
