src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
sotilas:sotil n_32_as ;
lapikas:lapikk n_32_as ;
kallokas:kallokk n_32_as ;
luola-asukas:luola-#asukk n_32_as ;
asukas:asukk n_32_as ;
halukas:halukk n_32_as ;
poplakangas:popla#kank n_32_as ;
kangas:kank n_32_as ;
marjas:marj n_32_as ;
nokkarengas:nokka#renk n_32_as ;
rengas:renk n_32_as ;
kuningas:kunink n_32_as ;
varrais:vark n_32_as ;
ruvis:ruk n_32_is ;
internaattioppilas:internaatti#oppil n_32_as ;
lapinvalas:lapin#val n_32_as ;
saitavalas:saita#val n_32_as ;
pikkuvalas:pikku#val n_32_as ;
valjhaat:valj n_32_as_pl ;
nutukkhaat:nutukk n_32_as_pl ;
keläs:kel n_32_aes ;
pängäs:pänk n_32_aes ;
köngäs:könk n_32_aes ;
sapilas:sapil n_32_as ;
nauris:naur n_32_is ;
saalis:saal n_32_is ;
ruumis:ruum n_32_is ;
munas:mun n_32_as ;
ämmäaunas:ämmä#aun n_32_as ;
maitohammas:maito#hamp n_32_as ;
ostohammas:osto#hamp n_32_as ;
viishauđenhammas:viishauđen#hamp n_32_as ;
paivunlammas:paivun#lamp n_32_as ;
lammas:lamp n_32_as ;
kaalamasaapas:kaalama#saapp n_32_as ;
aikasaapas:aika#saapp n_32_as ;
karvas:karp n_32_as ;
opas:opp n_32_as ;
liikavarvas:liika#varp n_32_as ;
pikkuvarvas:pikku#varp n_32_as ;
patsas:pats n_32_as ;
hirvas:hirv n_32_as ;
viinitaras:viini#tar n_32_as ;
elläintaras:elläin#tar n_32_as ;
hetelmätaras:hetelmä#tar n_32_as ;
yrttitaras:yrtti#tar n_32_as ;
vieras:vier n_32_as ;
oras:or n_32_as ;
kulmakarvapenshaat:kulmakarva#pens n_32_as_pl ;
risupensas:risu#pens n_32_as ;
porsas:pors n_32_as ;
tehđas:teht n_32_as ;
suola-allas:suola-#alt n_32_as ;
dreneerinkiallas:dreneerinki#alt n_32_as ;
suolavesiallas:suola#vesi#alt n_32_as ;
mallas:malt n_32_as ;
pallas:palt n_32_as ;
parras:part n_32_as ;
porras:port n_32_as ;
koivurastas:koivu#rast n_32_as ;
jääpuras:jää#pur n_32_as ;
ruoholaatas:ruoho#laatt n_32_as ;
laatas:laatt n_32_as ;
hammasratas:hammas#ratt n_32_as ;
vuosiratas:vuosi#ratt n_32_as ;
rietas:riett n_32_as ;
hankaluus:hankaluu n_22_s_even ;
kavaluus:kavaluu n_22_s_even ;
huonomuus:huonomuu n_22_s_even ;
jumalattomuus:jumalattomuu n_22_s_even ;
kumppanuus:kumppanuu n_22_s_even ;
ihanuus:ihanuu n_22_s_even ;
pakanuus:pakanuu n_22_s_even ;
valmhius:valmhiu n_22_s_even ;
mestaruus:mestaruu n_22_s_even ;
aika-avaruus:aika-#avaruu n_22_s_even ;
avaruus:avaruu n_22_s_even ;
tieđonankaruus:tieđon#ankaruu n_22_s_even ;
tieđonankaruus:tieđon#ankaruu n_22_s_even ;
staatinporvaruus:staatin#porvaruu n_22_s_even ;
alakuloisuus:ala#kuloisuu n_22_s_even ;
ijänkaikkisuus:ijän#kaikkisuu n_22_s_even ;
eriarvoisuus:eri#arvoisuu n_22_s_even ;
lutherilaisuus:lutherilaisuu n_22_s_even ;
orginalisuus:orginalisuu n_22_s_even ;
samanarvoisuus:saman#arvoisuu n_22_s_even ;
samankaltaisuus:saman#kaltaisuu n_22_s_even ;
tietoisuus:tietoisuu n_22_s_even ;
arvoisuus:arvoisuu n_22_s_even ;
salhaisuus:salhaisuu n_22_s_even ;
tillaisuus:tillaisuu n_22_s_even ;
vapaaehtoisuus:vapaa#ehtoisuu n_22_s_even ;
oikkeuđenmukaisuus:oikkeuđenmukaisuu n_22_s_even ;
oikkeuđenmyötäisyys:oikkeuđenmyötäisyy n_22_s_even ;
salhaisuus+Err/Orth:salaisuu n_22_s_even ;
hiljaisuus:hiljaisuu n_22_s_even ;
mahtavuus:mahtavuu n_22_s_even ;
hetelmällisyys:hetelmällisyy n_22_s_even ;
kaksirankaisuus:kaksi#rankaisuu n_22_s_even ;
kärsivällisyys:kärsivällisyy n_22_s_even ; 
persoonallisuus:persoonallisuu n_22_s_even ;
uskonollisuus:uskonollisuu n_22_s_even ;
ystävällisyys:ystävällisyy n_22_s_even ;
rankaisuus:rankaisuu n_22_s_even ;
omaisuus:omaisuu n_22_s_even ;
monikertaisuus:moni#kertaisuu n_22_s_even ;
moninkertaisuus:monin#kertaisuu n_22_s_even ;
monipuolisuus:moni#puolisuu n_22_s_even ;
loogisuus:loogisuu n_22_s_even ;
ulettuvaisuus:ulettuvaisuu n_22_s_even ;
ulottuvaisuus:ulottuvaisuu n_22_s_even ;
umpisuus:umpisuu n_22_s_even ;
ikuisuus:ikuisuu n_22_s_even ;
henkkaavuus:henkkaavuu n_22_s_even ;
tähtitaivas:tähti#taiv n_32_as ;
tervas:terv n_32_as ;
jäsenyys:jäsenyy n_22_s_even ;
lämpimyys:lämpimyy n_22_s_even ;
ethäisyys:ethäisyy n_22_s_even ;
menheisyys+Err/Orth:menneisyy n_22_s_even ;
samamielisyys:sama#mielisyy n_22_s_even ;
vastoinmielisyys:vastoin#mielisyy n_22_s_even ;
yksikielisyys:yksi#kielisyy n_22_s_even ;
monikielisyys:moni#kielisyy n_22_s_even ;
näkkyyvyys:näkkyyvyy n_22_s_even ;
kieliväkkeevyys:kieli#väkkeevyy n_22_s_even ;
ikävyys:ikävyy n_22_s_even ;
mätäs:mätt n_32_aes ;
seiväs:seip n_32_aes ;
kevät:kev n_32_ae ;
